New York, session 2025-2026, S3521.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 21 of the workers' compensation law, subdivision 5 2 as amended by chapter 268 of the laws of 1946, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 21. Presumptions. In any proceeding for the enforcement of a claim 5 for compensation under this chapter, it shall be presumed in the absence 6 of substantial evidence to the contrary: 7 1. That the claim comes within the provision of this chapter[;]. 8 2. That sufficient notice thereof was given[;]. 9 3. That the injury was not occasioned by the willful intention of the 10 injured employee to bring about the injury or death of [himself] them- 11 self or of another[;]. 12 4. That the injury did not result solely from the intoxication of the 13 injured employee while on duty. 14 5. That the contents of medical and surgical reports introduced in 15 evidence by claimants for compensation shall constitute prima facie 16 evidence of fact as to the matter contained therein. 17 6. That an injured worker who has not refused an offer of reemployment 18 from their employer has not voluntarily withdrawn from the labor market. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07418-01-5